District of Columbia statutes.
32-1331.13

Further acts prohibited; penalty.

(a)

A person who knowingly incorporates or forms, or assists in the incorporation or formation of, a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity, or pays or collects a fee for use of a foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, limited liability corporation, or other entity for the purpose of facilitating, or evading detection of, a violation of this subchapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not less than $5,000 and not to exceed $20,000.

(b)

A person who knowingly conspires with, aids and abets, assists, advises, or facilitates, an employer with the intent of violating this subchapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not less than $5,000 and not to exceed $20,000.

History

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 976, ch. 924, § 213
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-300, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2679

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-300 added this section.